New York, session 2025-2026, A5574.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act reestablishes the office of coroner within the 2 county of Oswego and removes such powers and duties from the office of 3 the district attorney and places it with the office of the coroner with- 4 in the county of Oswego. 5 § 2. Section 400 of the county law is amended by adding a new subdivi- 6 sion 3-c to read as follows: 7 3-c. Coroner in Oswego county. The office of coroner is hereby rees- 8 tablished in the county of Oswego. The powers and duties of the coroner 9 previously held by the district attorney are now placed in the office of 10 the coroner of the county of Oswego. Such coroner shall be appointed by 11 the county legislature. The provisions of this section shall not have 12 the effect under section ten of the municipal home rule law to permit 13 any county, other than Oswego county as herein prescribed, to change, 14 amend or supersede, by local law, any provisions of this chapter. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 16 the district attorney in Oswego county shall continue to serve as the 17 coroner until such time as a coroner is appointed. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05562-01-5